public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-crx-build/vec.aff
FLAG UTF-8
# vèrbi '-er inregolari ((r[ei])èser)
# themeT1 + er/p
SFX p Y 307
SFX p èser é/P èser
SFX p èser élo/B èser
SFX p èser éƚo/B èser
SFX p èser ɉèra/FJLP èser
SFX p èser ɉèrami/K èser
SFX p èser ɉèrau/Q èser
SFX p èser ɉère/JL èser
SFX p èser ɉèrelo/B èser
SFX p èser ɉèreƚo/B èser
SFX p èser ɉèremi/K èser
SFX p èser ɉèri/NP èser
SFX p èser ɉèrimo/EL èser
SFX p èser ɉèrimoi/M èser
SFX p èser ɉèritu/O èser
SFX p èser ɉèro/JL èser
SFX p èser ɉèromi/K èser
SFX p èser erímoi/M èser
SFX p èser eren/L èser
SFX p èser eren/L [aei]r
SFX p èser ereni/M èser
SFX p èser ereni/M [aei]r
SFX p èser erense èser
SFX p èser erense [aei]r
SFX p èser erié/P èser
SFX p èser eriéu/Q èser
SFX p èser erion/EL èser
SFX p èser erioni/M èser
SFX p èser erionme/G èser
SFX p èser eriven/L èser
SFX p èser eriven/L [aei]r
SFX p èser eriveni/M èser
SFX p èser eriveni/M [aei]r
SFX p èser erivense èser
SFX p èser erivense [aei]r
SFX p èser erivié/P èser
SFX p èser eriviéu/Q èser
SFX p èser erivion/L èser
SFX p èser erivioni/M èser
SFX p èser erivionse èser
SFX p èser erivon/L èser
SFX p èser erivoni/M èser
SFX p èser erivonse èser
SFX p èser eron/EL èser
SFX p èser eroni/M èser
SFX p èser eronme/G èser
SFX p èser eséndome/G èser
SFX p èser esú èser
SFX p èser esúo/B èser
SFX p èser esendo/E èser
SFX p èser esente/I èser
SFX p èser esesto/BI èser
SFX p èser esudo/B èser
SFX p èser fúresimo/EL èser
SFX p èser fúresimoi/M èser
SFX p èser fúselo/B èser
SFX p èser fúseƚo/B èser
SFX p èser fúsimo/EL èser
SFX p èser fúsimoi/M èser
SFX p èser furese/IT èser
SFX p èser furesen/L èser
SFX p èser fureseni/M èser
SFX p èser furesense èser
SFX p èser furesié/P èser
SFX p èser furesiéu/Q èser
SFX p èser furesiede/P èser
SFX p èser furesiege/P èser
SFX p èser furesion/L èser
SFX p èser furesioni/M èser
SFX p èser furesionse èser
SFX p èser furesisen/L èser
SFX p èser furesiseni/M èser
SFX p èser furesisense èser
SFX p èser furesisié/P èser
SFX p èser furesisiede/P èser
SFX p èser furesisiege/P èser
SFX p èser furesision/L èser
SFX p èser furesisioni/M èser
SFX p èser furesisionse èser
SFX p èser furesison/L èser
SFX p èser furesisoni/M èser
SFX p èser furesisonse èser
SFX p èser fureson/L èser
SFX p èser furesoni/M èser
SFX p èser furesonse èser
SFX p èser fuse/IRT èser
SFX p èser fusen/L èser
SFX p èser fuseni/M èser
SFX p èser fusense èser
SFX p èser fusié/P èser
SFX p èser fusiéu/Q èser
SFX p èser fusiede/P èser
SFX p èser fusiege/P èser
SFX p èser fusion/L èser
SFX p èser fusioni/M èser
SFX p èser fusionse èser
SFX p èser fusisen/L èser
SFX p èser fusiseni/M èser
SFX p èser fusisense èser
SFX p èser fusisié/P èser
SFX p èser fusisiede/P èser
SFX p èser fusisiege/P èser
SFX p èser fusision/L èser
SFX p èser fusisioni/M èser
SFX p èser fusisionse èser
SFX p èser fusison/L èser
SFX p èser fusisoni/M èser
SFX p èser fusisonse èser
SFX p èser fuson/L èser
SFX p èser fusoni/M èser
SFX p èser fusonse èser
SFX p èser jèra/FJLP èser
SFX p èser jèrami/K èser
SFX p èser jèrau/Q èser
SFX p èser jère/JL èser
SFX p èser jèrelo/B èser
SFX p èser jèreƚo/B èser
SFX p èser jèreme/G èser
SFX p èser jèremi/K èser
SFX p èser jèri/NP èser
SFX p èser jèrimo/EL èser
SFX p èser jèrimoi/M èser
SFX p èser jèritu/O èser
SFX p èser jèro/JL èser
SFX p èser jèromi/K èser
SFX p èser sé/FPR èser
SFX p èser sémoi/M èser
SFX p èser séu/Q èser
SFX p èser sí/FNP èser
SFX p èser símoi/M èser
SFX p èser síu/Q èser
SFX p èser sarà/FJLN èser
SFX p èser saràe/F èser
SFX p èser saràvelo/B èser
SFX p èser saràveƚo/B èser
SFX p èser saràvemi/K èser
SFX p èser sarè/JL èser
SFX p èser sarèmi/K èser
SFX p èser saré/P èser
SFX p èser sarémoi/M èser
SFX p èser saréu/Q èser
SFX p èser sarí/P èser
SFX p èser saría/FJLN èser
SFX p èser saríami/K èser
SFX p èser saríatu/O èser
SFX p èser saríe/FJL èser
SFX p èser saríelo/B èser
SFX p èser saríeƚo/B èser
SFX p èser saríemi/K èser
SFX p èser sarímoi/M èser
SFX p èser saríu/Q èser
SFX p èser sarò/JL èser
SFX p èser saròmi/K èser
SFX p èser saralo/B èser
SFX p èser saraƚo/B èser
SFX p èser sarami/K èser
SFX p èser saratu/O èser
SFX p èser sarave/FS èser
SFX p èser saremo/EL èser
SFX p èser saren/L èser
SFX p èser sareni/M èser
SFX p èser sarié/P èser
SFX p èser sariéu/Q èser
SFX p èser sarimo/EL èser
SFX p èser saron/L èser
SFX p èser saroni/M èser
SFX p èser selo/B èser
SFX p èser seƚo/B èser
SFX p èser semo/EL èser
SFX p èser sen/L èser
SFX p èser seni/M èser
SFX p èser serà/FJLN èser
SFX p èser seràe/F èser
SFX p èser seràvelo/B èser
SFX p èser seràveƚo/B èser
SFX p èser seràvemi/K èser
SFX p èser serè/JL èser
SFX p èser serèmi/K èser
SFX p èser seré/P èser
SFX p èser serémoi/M èser
SFX p èser serésimo/L èser
SFX p èser serésimoi/M èser
SFX p èser serésitu/O èser
SFX p èser seréu/Q èser
SFX p èser serí/P èser
SFX p èser sería/FJLN èser
SFX p èser seríami/K èser
SFX p èser seríatu/O èser
SFX p èser seríe/FJL èser
SFX p èser seríelo/B èser
SFX p èser seríeƚo/B èser
SFX p èser seríemi/K èser
SFX p èser serímoi/M èser
SFX p èser serísitu/O èser
SFX p èser seríu/Q èser
SFX p èser serò/JL èser
SFX p èser seròmi/K èser
SFX p èser seralo/B èser
SFX p èser seraƚo/B èser
SFX p èser serami/K èser
SFX p èser seratu/O èser
SFX p èser serave/FS èser
SFX p èser seremo/EL èser
SFX p èser seren/L èser
SFX p èser sereni/M èser
SFX p èser serense èser
SFX p èser seresi/P èser
SFX p èser seresiu/Q èser
SFX p èser serié/P èser
SFX p èser seriéu/Q èser
SFX p èser serimo/EL èser
SFX p èser serion/L èser
SFX p èser serioni/M èser
SFX p èser serionse èser
SFX p èser serisen/L èser
SFX p èser seriseni/M èser
SFX p èser serisense èser
SFX p èser serisié/P èser
SFX p èser serisiéu/Q èser
SFX p èser serisi/P èser
SFX p èser serision/L èser
SFX p èser serisioni/M èser
SFX p èser serisionse èser
SFX p èser serisiu/Q èser
SFX p èser serison/L èser
SFX p èser serisoni/M èser
SFX p èser serisonse èser
SFX p èser seron/L èser
SFX p èser seroni/M èser
SFX p èser seronse èser
SFX p èser siàndome/G èser
SFX p èser siando/E èser
SFX p èser sime/H èser
SFX p èser simo/EL èser
SFX p èser sion/JKL èser
SFX p èser sioni/M èser
SFX p èser sionmi/K èser
SFX p èser sipí/P èser
SFX p èser sipiè/JL èser
SFX p èser sipièmi/K èser
SFX p èser sipié/P èser
SFX p èser sipiémoi/M èser
SFX p èser sipiéu/Q èser
SFX p èser sipi/FN èser
SFX p èser sipia/E èser
SFX p èser sipie/EFIJKL èser
SFX p èser sipiede/P èser
SFX p èser sipiege/P èser
SFX p èser sipiemo/EL èser
SFX p èser sipiemo/L èser
SFX p èser sipien/L èser
SFX p èser sipieni/M èser
SFX p èser sipime/H èser
SFX p èser sipimo/EL èser
SFX p èser sipimo/L èser
SFX p èser sipion/L èser
SFX p èser sipioni/M èser
SFX p èser sipitu/O èser
SFX p èser situ/O èser
SFX p èser son/JKL èser
SFX p èser soni/M èser
SFX p èser sonmi/K èser
SFX p èser stà èser
SFX p èser stado/B èser
SFX p èser stao/B èser
SFX p èser stasto/BI èser
SFX p èser stato/BI èser
SFX p èser stesto/BI èser
SFX p èser xèra/FJLP èser
SFX p èser xèrami/K èser
SFX p èser xèrau/Q èser
SFX p èser xère/JL èser
SFX p èser xèrelo/B èser
SFX p èser xèreƚo/B èser
SFX p èser xèremi/K èser
SFX p èser xèri/NP èser
SFX p èser xèrimo/EL èser
SFX p èser xèrimoi/M èser
SFX p èser xèritu/O èser
SFX p èser xèro/JL èser
SFX p èser xèromi/K èser
SFX p èser xe-stu èser
SFX p èser xe/FPR èser
SFX p èser xelo/B èser
SFX p èser xeƚo/B èser
SFX p èser xestu èser
SFX p 0 e èser
SFX p 0 ge èser
SFX p 0 me/G èser
SFX p 0 mene/G èser
SFX p er ar èser
SFX p er are èser
SFX p er arge èser
SFX p er arme/G èser
SFX p er armene/G èser
SFX p ser ra/FJLP èser
SFX p ser rami/K èser
SFX p ser rau/Q èser
SFX p ser re/JL èser
SFX p ser relo/B èser
SFX p ser reƚo/B èser
SFX p ser remi/K èser
SFX p ser ri/NP èser
SFX p ser rimo/EL èser
SFX p ser rimoi/M èser
SFX p ser ritu/O èser
SFX p ser ro/JL èser
SFX p ser romi/K èser


SFX B Y 8 # tute le deklinaŧion, ajetivi de prima klase
SFX B 0 o [^aieo]
SFX B 0 a [^aieo]
SFX B 0 i [^aieo]
SFX B 0 e [^aieo]
SFX B o a o
SFX B o e o
SFX B o i [^i]o
SFX B io i io
