public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-crx-build/vec.dic
xbaso/BI	po:verb is:participle_perfect_strong_1s st:xbàter
dixdito/BI	po:verb is:participle_perfect_strong_1s st:dixdíxer
prededoto/BI	po:verb is:participle_perfect_strong_1s st:prededúxer
dexxonto/BI	po:verb is:participle_perfect_strong_1s st:dexxónxer
èrso/BI	po:verb is:participle_perfect_strong_1s st:èrder
èser/pE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
èsar/pE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
reèser/pE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
reèsar/pE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
rièser/pE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
rièsar/pE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
estinto/BI	po:verb is:participle_perfect_strong_1s st:estínguer
ƚikuefaƚo/B	po:verb is:indicative_present_2s is:interrogative_3 st:ƚikuefar
strafato/BI	po:verb is:participle_perfect_strong_1s st:strafar
defenestrato/BI	po:verb is:participle_perfect_strong_1s st:defenestrar
sfranto/BI	po:verb is:participle_perfect_strong_1s st:sfrànder
xgrento/BI	po:verb is:participle_perfect_strong_1s st:xgrénđer
deskato/BI	po:verb is:participle_perfect_strong_1s st:deskàxer
skonbaso/BI	po:verb is:participle_perfect_strong_1s st:skonbàter
konkorso/BI	po:verb is:participle_perfect_strong_1s st:konkórer
inakòrso/BI	po:verb is:participle_perfect_strong_1s st:inakòrder
skovèrso/BI	po:verb is:participle_perfect_strong_1s st:skovèrder
skuèrto/BI	po:verb is:participle_perfect_strong_1s st:skuèrđer
xlièxo/BI	po:verb is:participle_perfect_strong_1s st:xlièder
intromeso/BI	po:verb is:participle_perfect_strong_1s st:introméter
moso/BI	po:verb is:participle_perfect_strong_1s st:mover
depento/BI	po:verb is:participle_perfect_strong_1s st:depénđer
anteposto/BI	po:verb is:participle_perfect_strong_1s st:antepóner
soraposto/BI	po:verb is:participle_perfect_strong_1s st:sorapóner
romaxo/BI	po:verb is:participle_perfect_strong_1s st:romàñer
resposto/BI	po:verb is:participle_perfect_strong_1s st:respónder
parsuto/BI	po:verb is:participle_perfect_strong_1s st:parsugar
intòrto/BI	po:verb is:participle_perfect_strong_1s st:intòrxer
interŧèso/BI	po:verb is:participle_perfect_strong_1s st:interŧéder
stravisto/BI	po:verb is:participle_perfect_strong_1s st:stravéder
vosudo/B	po:verb is:participle_perfect_strong_1s st:voler st:voƚer
gran/B	po:adjective po:noun
sto/B	po:pronoun po:adjective_demonstrative
primièro/B	po:numeral_ordenal
dèkuplo/B	po:numeral_multiplicative
xaliño/B	po:adjective po:noun
teriŧo/B	po:adjective po:noun
cipiƚeño/B	po:adjective
lonbardo/B	po:adjective
visentin/B	po:adjective
apelativo/B	po:adjective po:noun
bàkaro/B	po:noun
ceto/BI	po:adjective
dirèto/B	po:adjective po:noun
eskluxivo/BW	po:adjective
fiòso/BI	po:noun
frikativo/B	po:adjective
inparfèto/B	po:adjective
justo/BW	po:adjective po:adverb
karaterístego/B	po:adjective
komando/B	po:noun
kortèl/BU	po:noun
làteo/B	po:adjective
ƚeterario/B	po:adjective
matuxèƚo/B	po:adjective
moroxo/BI&	al:moruxi al:muruxi po:noun
oɉetivo/B	po:adjective
pedorativo/B	po:adjective
posesivo/B	po:adjective
putèl/BU	po:noun
romanxo/B	po:noun
semàntego/B	po:adjective
skarpèr/BV	po:noun
sotointexo/B	po:adjective po:noun
straŧo/BI	po:noun
tèƚego/B	po:adjective
ŧoto/BI	po:adjective
voƚontario/B	po:adjective po:noun
xustaposto/B	po:adjective
arsenalòto/BI	po:noun
bañarol/BUV	po:noun
beŧo/BI	po:noun
bonario/B	po:adjective
brúskoloxo/BI	po:adjective
dasièr/BV	po:noun
dulipan/BU	po:noun
fiasko/B	po:noun
frutèr/BV	po:noun
gonxo/B	po:adjective po:noun
insendoxo/BI	po:adjective
kaponèr/BV	po:noun
kavestro/B	po:adjective po:noun
koƚeto/B	po:noun
kòxo/B	po:noun
ƚeñoxo/B	po:adjective
mareskalko/B	po:noun
medegòto/BI	po:adjective po:noun
misco/B	po:noun
neŧeto/BI	po:noun
paexanòto/BI	po:noun
peliŧo/B	po:noun
piasaròl/BU	po:noun
portantin/B	po:noun
ranaroƚo/BV	po:noun
riŧoloxo/BI	po:adjective
sabionivo/B	po:adjective
sceto/BI	po:adjective
sieƚo/B	po:noun
skoƚaro/B	po:noun
sòƚio/B	po:adjective
stopoxo/BI	po:adjective
subio/B	po:noun
tinaŧèr/BV	po:noun
ŧercèr/BV	po:noun
venderesko/B	po:adjective
xbrixo/B	po:noun
xmortío/B	po:adjective
bukòliko/B	po:adjective po:noun
kortelinèr/BV	po:noun
fiƚador/BV	po:noun
novaso/B	po:noun
salmistrèr/BV	po:noun
stañin/B	po:noun
xoèr/BV	po:noun
